Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB302.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 11ADDITIONAL HOMESTEAD EXCLUSION ALLOCATIONSection 1101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to an additional homestead exclusion allocation.Section 1102. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819202122 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Farmstead property." As defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 8582 (relating to definitions) . "Homestead property." As defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 8401 (relating to definitions).Section 1103. Additional property tax reduction allocation.(a) Allocation.--A school district shall receive an allocation equal to t he total number of farmstead properties plus the total number of homestead properties in the school district multiplied by $1,000.(b) Uses.--A school district shall use the allocation under subsection (a) to provide an additional exclusion equal to 50% of the real estate tax due to the school district for each farmstead property and homestead property in the school district, or $1,000, whichever is less.(c) Report and certification.--Prior to the allocation of funds under subsection (a), a school district shall submit a report to the Department of Education with the total number of farmstead properties and homestead properties in the school district and the total amount of real estate taxes to be reduced. The Department of Education shall certify the total number of all farmstead properties and all homestead properties reported and the total amount of real estate taxes to be reduced, by school district, and transmit a copy of the certification to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 1104. Appropriation.The General Assembly shall appropriate to the Department of 20250HB0302PN0245 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education the amount determined under section 1103(c) for the purpose of making allocations under section 1103(a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0302PN0245 - 3 - 123